




Phoenician Offshore Fund Ltd. - Pooled Investment Fund- Khabbaz  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









Phoenician Offshore Fund Ltd.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    C/O Appleby Trust (Cayman) Ltd. Clifton House, 75 Fort Street, Po Box 13 
    George Town, Grand Cayman, E9, KY1-1108Phone: 345-949-8655 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-12-19


New


$28,120,593


$28,120,593


Equity Only


06b 3C 3C.1


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 John G. Khabbaz 
 Director 


 Ronald Khabbaz 
 Director 










    John Khabbaz | Phoenician Capital, LLC | ZoomInfo.com

Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC - List of CEOs, founders and company directors

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC
List of persons related to the company Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC. Find out list of CEOs, founders, board members, and company directors of Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC.

CIK Number: 0001683398Company address: 311 W. SUPERIOR STREET SUITE 217 CHICAGO 60654Phone number: 646-202-2559



People related to Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC
NamePositionStreetCityCountryMadrid  Borja311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoILSteele  Donnan311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoILMolenkamp  Greg311 W, Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoIL[none]  Phoenician Resources Fund II Manager, LLC311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoIL[none]  Phoenician Resources Fund Sponsor, LLC311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoILVaile  Ryan311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoILZimmerman  Shirley311 W. Superior Street Suite 217ChicagoIL




Phoenician Resources Fund II, LLC on the Web
Related companiesPhoenician Offshore Fund Ltd., Phoenician Offshore Master Fund Ltd., Phoenician Pines Investors, LP, Phoenician Resources Fund I, LLC












 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft




































































22nd Annual Alpha Hedge East -> Speakers















IMN HOME
DIVISION HOME









22nd Annual

                     Alpha Hedge East
                


                                            February 29 - March 01, 2016
                       
                








 


Speakers







Nanette Aguirre
Shareholder GreenbergTraurig


                                                    Corporate & Securities | Hedge Funds | Financial Institutions | Structured Finance & Derivatives | Investment Regulation Group | Financial Regulatory and Compliance Group
Nanette Aguirre concentrates on derivatives and structured products. Her experience includes negotiating all forms of international derivative (ISDA), trading and prime brokerage agreements with global institutions. Additionally, she regularly advises on regulatory issues affecting the derivatives market, including without limitation, Dodd Frank and related cross border regulation. Nanette works throughout Latin America, in countries like Mexico and Colombia, advising banks, endowments,  ... (view full description)





Maneet Ahuja
Producer, CNBC Hedge Fund Specialist CNBC, Squawk Box


                                                    Maneet Ahuja is CNBC's hedge fund specialist, producer on "Squawk Box" and author of The Alpha Masters, which was nominated for an FT/Goldman Sachs Book of the Year Award. Maneet is one of Forbes magazine's "30 Under 30", has been dubbed "The Wall Street Whisperer" by Elle magazine , named one of Marie Claire magazine's Media Moguls, and in 2010 was nominated for Crain's New York Business Forty Under 40 Rising Stars. In 2011, she co-created and developed the network's "Delivering Alpha" hedge fund summit in conjunction with Institutional Investor and was awarded CNBC's prestigious Enterprise Award in 2009 for her groundbreaking coverage of the industry. She has covered the World Economic For ... (view full description)





Fareed Ajani
Managing Partner Flanagan Lloyds Capital Management


                                                    Fareed F. Ajani is a Founding Partner of Flanagan Lloyds Capital Management and Flanagan Lloyds Global Asset Management.  The Alternative Asset Management Companies offer unique wealth creation opportunities via its hybrid Hedge Fund and Private Equity Fund vehicles.  Flanagan Lloyds is solely focused on enhancing value for investors and stakeholders by providing access to traditionally unobtainable opportunities in the global markets.
 
Previously, Mr. Ajani was a Director and Senior Relationship Manager with the Southeast division of U.S. Corporate Banking at Wells Fargo. He was responsible for managing large corporate client relationships, corporate lending and business develo ... (view full description)





Christina Alfonso
Partner and Chief Executive Officer Madeira Global


                                                    Christina M. Alfonso is the Chief Executive Officer of Madeira Global. Since its inception, Ms. Alfonso has set the framework for the organization's overall vision and strategy and has led its implementation, product development and expansion efforts.
 
Prior to Madeira, Ms. Alfonso served as a director of World Wide Investments Group, a Brazilian private equity firm, and as senior private client associate and hedge fund liaison at Alliance Bernstein, LP,  in New York, where she focused on private client advisory services.
 
Ms. Alfonso’s leadership role in the field of impact investing has been highlighted in distinguished financial publications including Institution ... (view full description)





Bill Bassin
Director Wells Fargo Prime Services


                                                    Bill Bassin joined Wells Fargo Prime Services  in 2014 with a focus on Endowments, Foundations, and other institutional hedge fund investors.
 
Previously Bill was a Managing Director at UBP Asset Management, and also Director of Investments for the Museum of Modern Art's Endowment. Prior to the MoMA Endowment, Bill held various Portfolio Management and structuring roles at Auda Hedge, Lehman Brothers, and UBS Investment Bank. 
 
Bill is also an Adjunct Professor at New York University, teaching the “Introduction to Hedge Funds” Class there for over 11 years. Over the last decade, Bill has been asked to speak to institutional investors on best hedge fund due diligence ... (view full description)





Bradley Belt
Vice Chairman Orchard Global Asset Management


                                                    Bradley D. Belt is Vice Chairman of Orchard Global Capital Group, a global alternatives asset manager headquartered in Singapore with offices in London, Washington and Toronto, a role he assumed on May 1, 2013. Belt is also the Chairman and founder of Palisades Capital Management LLC, a boutique restructuring advisory firm established in partnership with Reservoir Capital, a private investment firm with over $6B in capital under management. Principals of Palisades have advised on many of the largest and most complex M&A and corporate restructuring transactions of the past decade. Representative advised clients include Motorola, Nortel, YRC Worldwide, United Airlines, Huntsman and the PBG ... (view full description)





Sanford Brown
Managing Director, Head of Business Development Alternative Investment Group


                                                    Sanford Brown is the Managing Director of Business Development for Alternative Investment Group responsible for developing relationships with institutional consultants, wealth advisors and end investors, including endowments, foundations, pension plans and family offices. He joined the firm in July 2012.
Prior to joining Alternative Investment Group, Sanford was a Director of Sales and Marketing at Larch Lane Advisors, an affiliate of Old Mutual Asset Management. Prior to that, he was the Director of Alternative Investments for Old Mutual Asset Management. He also previously oversaw U.S. hedge fund distribution at Deutsche Bank and Global
Asset Management (GAM). ... (view full description)





Tim Bruce
Director of Traditional Research NEPC


                                                    As director of traditional research at NEPC, Tim overseas a broad area of investment research spanning equities, fixed income, and real assets. Tim is also active in NEPCs investment research and due diligence activities in alternative investments with a particular focus on hedged equity strategies. Outside of his formal research responsibilities, Tim provides consulting services for both traditional and non-traditional asset classes of various public, corporate, Taft-Hartley and endowment/foundation clients. Tim is a member of NEPC's International Equity Advisory Group, Traditional Research Group, and the Alternative Asset Due Diligence Committee. A frequent conference spea ... (view full description)





Martin Cass
Director at Large BDO Business Development Board of Palm Beach County


                                                    EXPERIENCE SUMMARY
Mr. Cass has over 30 years of public accounting experience in auditing, taxation and consulting services for closely-held to large public companies, hedge funds, as well as high net worth individuals. He provides his clients a broad and deep knowledge of all areas of state, federal and international tax. He has significant experience in partnership taxation, corporate, individual and estate tax planning, financial planning and financial management.
He has served clients in various industries, including real estate, construction, emerging business and technology, healthcare, publishing and entertainment, professional associations, nonprofi ... (view full description)





Allison Cohen
Director of Client Relations Bija Advisors LLC


                                                    For nearly thirty years, Stephen Duneier has applied cognitive science to investment management. The result has been the turnaround of numerous institutional trading businesses, career best returns for experienced portfolio managers who have adopted his methods, the development of a $1.25 billion dollar hedge fund and 20.3% average annualized returns as a global macro portfolio manager. 
Mr. Duneier teaches graduate level Decision Analysis in the College of Engineering at the University of California. 
Through Bija Advisors' consulting practice, he works one-on-one with some of the world’s most experienced and successful portfolio managers, CIOs, asset allocators and business lea ... (view full description)





Michael Corcelli
Managing Member Alexander Alternative Capital


                                                    Michael Corcelli is the Managing Member of the General Partner and the Investment Manager and serves as a Portfolio Manager of the Partnership. Mr. Corcelli has extensive investment experience as the founder and manager of Alexander Alternative Capital, LLC – a global macro hedge fund that was ranked in the 96 percentile of a pool of 973 hedge funds in the Bloomberg Universe of Hedge Funds. While leading Alexander, Michael purchased the first electronically traded receivable and invested in The Receivables Exchange (TRE). As of November 2012, TRE is majority owned by the New York Stock Exchange, Bain Capital, Fidelity Partners, PRISM and Alexander Alternative Capital, LLC. Mr. Corcelli is al ... (view full description)





Ricardo Cortez
Co-Chief Executive Officer Broadmark Asset Management, LLC


                                                    
As Co-Chief Executive Officer, Mr. Cortez is responsible for the management of Broadmark’s day-to-day business activities as well as the oversight of the firm’s sales and marketing efforts. In addition, he is a member of the Investment Team and serves as the firm’s Chief Risk Officer. Mr. Cortez joined Broadmark in September 2009 as President, Global Distribution and was named Co-CEO in June 2013. Before Broadmark, he was President of the Private Client Group for Torrey Associates, LLC. Additional prior roles include Vice President at Goldman Sachs serving as Product Manager of the firm’s Global Multi-Manager Strategies program, and Senior Vice President with Prudential Investme ... (view full description)





Lester Coyle
Chief Investment Officer III Capital Management


                                                    Dr. Lester Coyle is a principal and Co-Chief Investment Officer of III Capital Management where he is also the portfolio manager for the III Credit funds. Dr. Coyle joined III in February 2005 from Commerzbank where he was US head of credit correlation trading. Prior to that, he worked at Bank One as a single name and correlation trader on the credit desk, and as a credit model builder in the quantitative group. Lester holds a PhD in mathematics from the University of Michigan and a B.A. in mathematics from Trinity College, Dublin. Dr. Coyle was also a mathematics professor at Duke University and Loyola University. He is co-author of the book "Lectures in Contemporary Probability" and has pu ... (view full description)





Tonio DeSorrento
CEO Vemo Education


                                                    Tonio DeSorrento is cofounder and CEO of Vemo Education (Vemo.com), a company addressing the student debt crisis at its root by helping colleges match their cost to their value. 
 
DeSorrento is an industry leader in the development of financial products that align colleges and students.  He has broad experience in education finance, serving as outside counsel to Sallie Mae on its student loan securitization and conduit funding programs and advising other student lenders on matters ranging from product development to debt and equity finance.
 
DeSorrento was most recently at SoFi, where he was the primary transactional and financial products lawyer for the company.  H ... (view full description)





Justin Dew
Director of Strategy Welton Investment Partners


                                                    No biography specified
                                                
                                            




Michael Dieschbourg
Senior Portfolio Manager Federated Investors


                                                    Michael T. Dieschbourg is Senior Vice President and Managing Director of the Alternatives/Managed Risk Group. He is responsible for overseeing the development and management of Federateds portfolio of alternative and risk management products. He is a member of the Chartered Alternative Investment Analyst Association.Before joining Federated in 2014, Michael served as Global Dynamic Equity Manager, Senior Managing Director at Broadmark Asset Management; Global and International Equity Manager, Chief Executive Officer at Global Currents Investment Management, LLC (a Legg Mason Company); Global and International Equity and Fixed Income Manager, Managing Director at Brandywine Global ... (view full description)





Adam Duncan
Senior Investment Director Cambridge Associates


                                                    Focus and Experience
 
 Adam Duncan is Managing Director, Global Investment Research, at Cambridge Associates located in Boston. In this role, Adam’s responsibilities include manager research and selection, portfolio construction and the oversight of a large hedge fund portfolio. He specializes in discretionary and systematic macro, CTAs, and other quantitative based approaches. Adam is a member of the firm’s Manager Research Investment Committee and is a frequent research contributor.
 
Prior to joining Cambridge Associates, Adam spent most of his career in trading, structuring, and sales of fixed income and foreign exchange derivatives. He spent 12  ... (view full description)





Breanne Eshelman
Associate Director PAAMCO


                                                    Breanne is an Associate Director working in Portfolio and Account Management. She serves as the Portfolio Manager and main point of contact for certain institutional investor relationships.
Throughout her career at PAAMCO, Breanne has conducted research, due diligence, and risk monitoring for managers across all PAAMCO strategies with an emphasis on long-short equity and credit strategies.
Prior to joining PAAMCO, Breanne worked at Morgan Stanley in London where she managed risk on a portfolio of commercial mortgage debt and securities. Breanne began her career at Countrywide Commercial Real Estate Finance, where she focused on commercial loan origination, underwritin ... (view full description)





Philip Falcone
Chairman, President and CEO HC2 Holdings, Inc.


                                                    Philip A. Falcone has served as a director of HC2 since January 2014, and as Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of HC2 since May 2014. Mr. Falcone served as a director, Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer of HRG Group Inc. (“HRG”) from July 2009 to November 2014. From July 2009 to July 2011, Mr. Falcone also served as the President of HRG. Mr. Falcone is also the Chief Investment Officer and Chief Executive Officer of Harbinger Capital Partners LLC (“Harbinger Capital”) and other Harbinger Capital affiliated funds. Mr. Falcone co-founded the funds affiliated with Harbinger Capital in 2001. Mr. Falcone has over two decades of experience in leveraged finance, distre ... (view full description)





Darren Feld
Vice President Mesirow Advanced Strategies, Inc.


                                                    Darren Feld is a Vice President at Mesirow Advanced Strategies, Inc (MAS). MAS is a widely-recognized investment advisor specializing in building customized multi-manager portfolios for qualified institutional investors.
Mr. Feld has over 20 years of experience serving in various research, investment advisory, and analysis roles at leading asset management, alternatives, and insurance firms. He joined MAS in 2004, focusing primarily on hedge fund manager due diligence, strategy analysis, and manager monitoring. Since 2009, Mr. Feld has leveraged his experience in manager due diligence to create customized client solutions at MAS, and is a member of the Client Portfolio Management ... (view full description)





Mark Fitzpatrick
Managing Partner Glide Capital, LLC


                                                    Mark Fitzpatrick co-founded Glide Capital LLC (“Glide”) in 2015.  Glide provides wealth managers, family offices and institutional investors with an easy solution to building diversified portfolios within the "marketplace lending industry”. Glide performs due diligence on the industry and provides select opportunities which can be researched through our web portal.  Clients can invest into our portfolio or wealth managers can build their own branded portfolio. As a managing partner of Glide, Mark is responsible for selecting managers, raising capital and building strategic relationships for the firm. Mark has 20+ years experience in operations and business development roles within the altern ... (view full description)





Anthony Foley
Head Product Strategist (USA) Winton Capital


                                                    Before joining Winton in September 2014, Anthony spent eight years as a Managing Director at DE Shaw Investment Management in New York where he was CIO of the firms long-only equity business, managing a worldwide team of researchers, traders and portfolio managers, and representing DE Shaw as a senior client facing resource.Anthony has extensive experience in quantitative asset management across multiple asset classes from research and portfolio management perspectives. He was Head of Quantitative Research at State Street Global Advisors in Boston for five year, and spent nine years as a director of Pareto Partners in London and New York.Born and educated in the UK, T ... (view full description)





Mike Geller
EVP Edelman


                                                    
Mike Geller advises founders, C-Suite executives and business leaders of private investment firms and publicly-traded financial institutions on strategic communications, including financial and corporate public relations, reputation management and leadership positioning.
He has significant expertise counseling major hedge funds, emerging asset managers and international investment firms spanning a broad array of investment styles and strategies.  His clients have included firms such as Citadel, AQR, Baupost, Canyon Partners, Highbridge, Hayman Capital, Pershing Square, Element Capital, AXA Investment Managers, SkyBridge, Cartica Capital, Ashford Investment Management, Sele ... (view full description)





Ari Glass
Partner Boothbay Fund Management


                                                    Ari Glass is the founding partner and managing member of Boothbay. Boothbay was founded in 2012, and in July 2014 launched Boothbay Absolute Return Strategies LP, a market neutral multi manager, multi strategy fund that invests primarily in emerging managers.  At Boothbay, Ari Glass is responsible for all aspects of running the fund and the business.
 
Previously, Mr. Glass served as President of Paine Heights Management LLC, initially a part of Platinum Management (NY) LLC (“Platinum”).  While at Paine Heights, Mr. Glass oversaw the company's interests, including the management of a special opportunity hedge fund that invested exclusively in SPACs and, through a subsidiary, advi ... (view full description)





Dave Goodboy
Founder Palm Beach Hedge Fund Association


                                                    David S. Goodboy is managing director and founder of the Palm Beach Hedge Fund Association and Vice President of Marketing for intrendX llc, a Palm Beach and New York City based marketing service to ultra high net worth family offices and individuals.
 
In addition to his role at intrendX, David works with Adria Partners—a Bond Lease Real Estate Fund, founded by world renowned philanthropist and real estate investors, Dr. Zell Kravinsky as well as, Dr. Barry Brian.  
 
Prior to forming intrendX, he learned the fund business from the ground up with the 5th Avenue based niche fund of funds, Eagle’s View Asset Ma ... (view full description)





Alex Greyserman
Chief Scientist ISAM Systematic


                                                    Alex Greyserman is a member of the ISAM Systematic Investment Committee. He has 25 years of experience in the Managed Futures industry, having starting initially as Research Director at Mint Investment Management Co. ("Mint") where he was responsible for research and development of trading strategies and overall portfolio risk management. In 2001, Alex together with Larry Hite formed Hite Capital Management, a family office operation in New York, where Mr. Greyserman served as CIO until 2010, when Hite Capital Management merged with ISAM.Alex holds an MS in Electrical Engineering from Columbia University, an MBA, and a Ph.D. in Statistics from Rutgers University. His dissertat ... (view full description)





Peter Halloran
CEO Pharos Financial Group


                                                    No biography specified
                                                
                                            




Robert Harvey
Partner Jenks & Harvey LLP


                                                    Robert J. Harvey
Partner
Jenks & Harvey LLP
West Palm Beach, Florida
 
 
Robert concentrates his practice in securities arbitration and litigation. He has represented major brokerage firms and financial institutions, directors, officers, and financial advisors, in complex litigation in both state and federal courts, and FINRA arbitration. Robert defends financial institutions and individuals in regulatory proceedings before the SEC, FINRA, and state regulatory authorities. Additionally, Robert represents individual and institutional investors who have suffered monetary losses as the result of securities fraud.
 
Robert bega ... (view full description)





Gary Hines
Senior Vice President Business Development Board of Palm Beach County


                                                    Gary Hines is Senior Vice President, Administration for the Business Development Board of Palm Beach County, Inc.  He joined the BDB in May 1989 and for his first 15 years with the organization was primarily responsible for business recruitment.  He was directly engaged in the early efforts to bring the east coast expansion of The Scripps Research Institute to Palm Beach County.
 
In 2015 the Business Development Board assisted 25 companies (including 3 hedge funds) relocate to or expand in Palm Beach County resulting in the creation of 3,604 new jobs, 1,364,000 square feet of leased or newly constructed space and a combined capital investment of $284.6 million.
 
Gar ... (view full description)





Lynn Jerath
President Citrine Investment Group


                                                    Ms. Jerath is the President & Founder of Citrine Investment Group, a real estate investment management firm.  She launched Citrine Value Fund in 2015, which is an absolute return, value oriented long/short hedge fund focused on publicly traded real estate and related sectors.
Ms. Jerath has over 20 years of experience in real estate investing.  Prior to founding Citrine, Ms. Jerath spent seven years as a Senior Vice President and partner at GEM Realty Capital, a real estate securities and private equity firm.  Over her career, Ms. Jerath has closed over $4 billion in transactions.  Prior to GEM, Ms. Jerath was a Vice President at The Carlyle Group and also worked at Goldman S ... (view full description)





Paul Joss
Investment Strategist Hartford Investment Management Company


                                                    Paul Joss is an investment strategist and portfolio manager for Hartford Investment Management Company. Paul’s primary responsibilities include oversight for defined benefit pension investments and other long-duration assets. Specific areas of focus for 2015 include private debt, private market alternatives, iCOLI solutions, and pension de-risking more broadly. Prior to joining HIMCO in 2007, Paul served plan sponsors, endowments, and foundations in Canada as part of Towers Perrin’s (now Towers Watson’s) retirement and investment consulting practices. Paul is a CFA Charterholder, a Fellow of the Society of Actuaries, and has a Masters in Financial Mathematics from the University of Calgary.
                                                
                                            




Ankur Keswani
Senior Managing Director Serengeti Asset Management


                                                    Prior to joining Serengeti Asset Management, Ankur was a High Yield and Distressed trader at Goldman Sachs.  She was a market maker for the Healthcare, Chemicals and Media/Broadcasting sectors. Her position allowed her to facilitate customer flows and manage the firms proprietary risk.  From 2000 to 2004, she was the lead Healthcare Analyst in the High Yield Research Division.
In 2003 and 2004 she was ranked top three High Yield Healthcare Analysts by Institutional Investment Magazine.  Previously, she was an Analyst in Emerging Market Sales for Goldman Sachs Singapore.
Ankur received her B.A. with Honors from Oxford University in Philosophy, Politics and Economics.   ... (view full description)





Richard Klitzberg
President Klitzberg Associates, Inc.


                                                    Richard Klitzberg has been involved in the securities business for in excess of 45 years.  He is expert in the placement of investment capital for institutional investors and high net worth individuals.
 He began his career in 1969 at Bache & Co.  He established and managed their Investment Management Services Division which consulted to prominent institutional investors in selecting and monitoring third-party professional investment managers.  Clients included the retirement funds of large corporations, public funds, endowments, foundations and labor unions.  He managed a staff of 14 professionals and a national clientele with invested assets exceedi ... (view full description)





Rainford Knight
Board Member FLAIA


                                                    Dr. Knight joins the FLAIA from the University of Miami and Florida Atlantic University, where he holds joint professorship positions. In addition to his academic focus, he brings a wealth of applied industry experience, as he is a Co-Founder and Partner of the Florida Institute of Finance, a consulting and financial services thank tank located in West Palm Beach, FL. Dr. Knight also possesses significant applied industry experience in the areas of: Mergers and Acquisition, Venture Capital Investments, Fixed Income Pool Analytics, Hedge Fund Analytics and Portfolio Construction and Asset Allocation. He holds a Ph.D. in Finance from Florida Atlantic University with a doctoral thesis in the ar ... (view full description)





Tracy Knudsen
SVP, Market Research Lowry Research Corp.


                                                    Tracy Knudsen, CMT, is a Senior Vice President and Senior Market Analyst at Lowry Research and has been a Technical Market Analyst for more than 20 years. In her role at Lowry, Ms. Knudsen produces comprehensive analysis of the U.S. equity market and serves as lead analyst for Lowry Global, a product that covers 22 international equity markets. Prior to joining Lowry, Tracy held the position of Senior Market Strategist at Candlecharts.com and prior to that, Senior Technical Analyst at Stone & McCarthy Research Associates.  She is co-author of Mastering Market Timing: Using the Works of L.M. Lowry and R.D. Wyckoff to Identify Key Market Turning Points, published in July 2011 by the FT Pre ... (view full description)





Jon Kuczmarski
Portfolio Manager WhaleRock Point Partners, LLC


                                                    Jon Kuczmarski is a portfolio manager with WhaleRockPoint Partners, LLC. Jon covers the Energy, Materials and Utilities space for WhaleRock Point Partners LLC. Mr. Kuczmarski is a member of WhaleRock Point’s Investment Committee which oversees all investment operations for Whalerock Point.
Jon received a MBA in Finance from the Fordham University Gabelli School of Business in 2008 and a BA in Government from Harvard University in 2002.
Jon’s experience includes J&W Seligman & Co and his own investment advisory firm, Aldershot Capital, LLC. Aldershot Capital was founded in May 2010 and Mr. Kuczmarski was the Managing Partner until joining WhaleRock Point Partners in  ... (view full description)





Julie Lohrmann
Head of Business Development, North America Prytania Investments


                                                    Before joining Prytania Group, Julie spent ten years as a Portfolio Manager and Investment Analyst at Grosvenor Capital Management, one of the largest Fund of Hedge Funds. She served as relationship manager for some of Grosvenor's largest clients and was instrumental in business development initiatives. In 2013 Julie brought her passion for building client relationships to Prytania, a London-based structured credit specialist. She heads the firm's North America sales and investor relations efforts. Julie holds an MBA from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business.
                                                
                                            




Shalin Madan
Managing Director Strenta Investment Management


                                                    Shalin Madan is a Managing Director at Strenta Investment Management, Inc., an SEC registered investment adviser that is part of a family office. Shalin has responsibilities for all aspects of investment and portfolio management in a multi-asset class portfolio. Previously, Shalin was a Vice-President at Ivy Asset Management, where as a Portfolio Manager he oversaw the firm’s flagship multi-manager hedge fund portfolios. He began his career in alternative assets at Dome Capital Management, a hedge fund advisory firm for European institutional and super high net worth investors. Shalin holds an MBA in Finance from the Stern School of Business at New York University and a BA from the Universit ... (view full description)





Taylor Mann
Portfolio Manager Pine Capital


                                                    No biography specified
                                                
                                            




Charles Mautz
CEO Chinus Asset Management


                                                    Mr. Mautz oversees CHAM's investment activities including research, allocation and manager selection. Prior to founding Chinus in 2008, Charles was a Managing Partner at an emerging growth company accelerator, and a Managing Director at Aequitas Capital Management. At Aequitas, he led the firm’s efforts to form new fund products and oversaw its fund management activities.
Prior to 2004, Mr. Mautz held various strategic, financial and M&A roles in Los Angeles and New York. From 1999 – 2004 he was in charge of strategy and M&A at CMS, a leader in financial research distribution. While at CMS, he played an integral role in their expansion into Europe (via acquisition) and As ... (view full description)





Martin McNulty
Conference Producer IMN


                                                    No biography specified
                                                
                                            




David Menlow
President SecondaryRatings.com


                                                    Began Wall St. career in 1977 on the sellside.
 
Designed various technical trading systems for stocks and commodities during the 1980s.
 
Started IPO Financial Network in 1990 to provide independent research on the New Issues market, making it the oldest specialty new issues firm on the Street.
 
The IPOfn New Issues Information Service was the first to provide comprehensive opening premium expectations for IPOs and Secondaries in the US equity market, allowing the buyside to make better decisions regarding indications with the sellside.
 
David is the longest established source for interviews for all the major financial TV networks including: ... (view full description)





Rachel Minard
Founder and Chief Executive Officer Minard Capital, LLC


                                                    
Rachel S.L. Minard is the Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Minard Capital, a leading independent, global asset raising consulting firm headquartered in San Francisco, California. The firm is dedicated to offering strategic, asset raising consulting services to alternative investment management firms around the world.  Minard Capital is not a broker/dealer nor third-party marketer.
 
Before building Minard Capital, Rachel built and managed global institutional investment businesses for 22 years, including 14 years building fund of hedge fund firms, notably Cadogan Management and Corbin Capital Partners. Having raised over $12 billion in her career, Rachel starte ... (view full description)





Alfonso Montero
Chief Investment Officer Credicorp Capital


                                                    Alfonso Montero has 18 years of experience investing in the Latin American bond and equity markets. He is currently Chief Investment Officer at Credicorp Capital, an investment bank with offices in Lima, Santiago, and Bogota, in charge of overseeing $ 6 billion in mutual funds and institutional client mandates. He is also the portfolio manager of the Credicorp Capital Pacific Alliance Equity Fund, which invests in the equity markets of the “MILA” Region (Mexico, Peru, Chile, and Colombia). In 2007 he co-founded Creuza Advisors, the leading independent Multifamily Office firm in Peru, where he was CIO until joining Credicorp Capital in 2013. Previously, he served as deputy CIO at Prima AFP, C ... (view full description)





Olga Ovodenko
Founder Cranford Advisors


                                                    Olga Ovodenko is the founder of Cranford Advisors, a firm specializing in strategic investment consulting and business development. 
Olga is also a Director at OCP Capital, LLC, where she focuses on alternative investments, including hedge funds, private equity, real estate, venture capital, and direct investments.
 
Olga’s prior professional experience includes roles at BlackRock, Davidson Kempner, and Lombard Odier.
Philanthropically, Olga is involved as a mentor and board member with iMentor,  an organization that builds mentoring relationships that empower students from low-income communities to graduate high school, succeed in college, and achieve their ambitions ... (view full description)





Joseph Pignatelli
President and Co-Portfolio Manager The Archstone Partnerships


                                                    Mr. Pignatelli is the President and Co-Portfolio Manager. He is also a Member of A.P. Management Company, LLC and Archstone Management Company, LLC. Additionally, he has been a Director ofArchstone Offshore Fund, Ltd., Archstone Absolute Return Strategies Fund, Ltd., Archstone Equity Strategies Fund, Ltd., and A.P. Opportunities Fund, Ltd. since their formations. He has over 30 years of investment management experience. Mr. Pignatelli directs the ongoing operations of the Investment Manager and all related investment entities, including all management and financial matters. His responsibilities also include investment policy, portfolio management, and manager selection and he is a member of  ... (view full description)





James Rubin
Founder and CEO RubinHaney Capital Management


                                                    Mr. Rubin has been a deep value investor for more than 30 years. From 1989 to 2004, he was the Chief Investment Officer and Co-Founder of Resurgence Asset Management, one of the first deep value and distressed investment firms. At Resurgence, Mr. Rubin designed the funds’ strategy, created its research protocol, hired and trained 12 analysts, and managed its 30 person team. He raised over $2 billion in assets while managing the firm’s fund products. Mr. Rubin departed Resurgence to become the sole founder of Gradient Partners in 2005, which ceased managing third party capital in 2008 when the fund’s largest investors redeemed during the financial crisis. Prior to Resurgence, Mr. Rubin also f ... (view full description)





Ambassador Sarukhan
President Sarukhan & Associates


                                                    Arturo Sarukhan is a nonresident senior fellow in the Foreign Policyand Metropolitan Policy programs at Brookings. He focuses on hemispheric issues, Mexico-U.S. relations, immigration policy, new security threats, and the role of cities in the 21st Century. He is chairman of Global Solutions/A Podesta Company, a global strategic consulting and risk assessment firm. The grandson and son of conflict refugees in Mexico, he served as a career diplomat in the Mexican Foreign Service for 20 years and received the rank of career ambassador in 2006.
                                                
                                            




Michael Secondo
Senior Vice President US Bancorp Fund Services, LLC


                                                    
Michael Secondo serves as global business development manager for the alternative investments divisions U.S. and European operations. Mr. Secondo joined U.S. Bancorp Fund Services in 2011 with more than 20 years of sales, relationship management, marketing, business development, and managerial experience in financial services. Prior to joining U.S. Bancorp Fund Services, Mr. Secondo worked for ABN AMROs Prime Fund Solutions where he was director and team leader focusing on both new and existing hedge fund client administration, custody and finance services. He also spent 17 years at Citigroup where he held various positions associated with the alternative asset industry. ... (view full description)





John Shearman
Partner Albourne


                                                    John Shearman is a managing director at TeamCo Advisers, a privately owned and SEC-registered investment advisory firm. He works as a product specialist aiding clients in the understanding and use of customized hedge fund solutions. Before joining TeamCo, Mr. Shearman was CEO of IV Lions, a registered investment adviser specializing in the use of liquid alternative investments. Prior to that he was a partner at Albourne Partners, the world’s premier alternative investment advisory firm, where he advised sophisticated investors on alternative investments. In June 2012, he was named Hedge Fund Consultant of the Year by Institutional Investor at the 10th Annual Hedge Fund Industry Awards in New ... (view full description)





David Siemer
Managing Partner Wavemaker Partners


                                                    David Siemer is the co-founder of Wavemaker Partners, an early-stage venture fund focused on Southern California and Southeast Asia, currently investing out of its third fund.  He concurrently founded Siemer & Associates in 2007 to fulfill his vision of a true boutique merchant bank that works with technology, software and digital media companies throughout their complete life cycle. At Siemer & Associates, David has led several complex transactions to major technology companies including Google, CBS, Adconion, Entravision, and Disney.
He was previously with Montgomery & Co. where he served as a key member of the Digital Media Investment Banking Group. In this capacit ... (view full description)





Henley Smith
Senior Vice President Vanderbilt Avenue Asset Management LLC


                                                    Henley Smith, Senior Vice President-Business Development
Henley Smith currently serves as Senior Vice President with primary responsibility of business development through the introduction of individual, family office and selective institutional clients to Vanderbilt Avenue Asset Management’s portfolio solutions in short-duration fixed income investments and related market strategies.  He also offers clients a wealth of insight and experience through the conservative construction of cash management investment portfolios that enhances return, liquidity and principal safety. 
Before joining Vanderbilt, Henley served as Senior Director–Investment in Oppenheimer & Co Inc.’s ... (view full description)





Arvin Soh
Portfolio Manager & Invest. Committee Member GAM Alternative Investments


                                                    Arvin Soh is a Portfolio Manager in GAM's Multi-Manager team, responsible for their global macro and managed futures investments. In addition, as an Investment Committee member, he is also involved in broader hedge fund strategies and portfolios. Prior to joining GAM in 2005, Arvin was a manager within the pension group at Pfizer, with primary responsibility for manager selection in international equity, global macro and currency funds. Before that, he was an assistant portfolio manager, where he managed capital with a focus on technology and media companies at a quantitatively based fundamental hedge fund.

Arvin began his career at Bankers Trust/Deutsche Bank, where he was a vice president ... (view full description)





Aaron Steinberg
Director Pershing LLC, a BNY Mellon Company


                                                    
Aaron Steinberg is a Director for Pershing, a BNY Mellon company. In his current role as a senior member of the Sales and Relationship Management group within Pershing Prime Services, Aaron establishes and maintains prime brokerage and financing relationships with hedge funds, mutual funds and other alternative managers. Recently he has been tapped as a subject matter expert on liquid alternative strategies.
 
Prior to joining Pershing in 2007, Aaron was a vice president for Bear Stearns Global Clearing Services, where he was a member of the Prime Brokerage Consulting group. Aaron was responsible for consulting hedge funds on all aspects of operational and business p ... (view full description)





Richard Stone
CEO Stone Family Office


                                                     

 

Since earning his J.D. from Columbia Law School, Mr. Stone has amassed extensive legal expertise, dating back to his earliest experience as a law clerk for the Honorable Charles Sifton of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York. Rick is a former partner at one of the countries oldest law firms, Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft. He has been Lead Counsel on several major high profile succesful consumer and securities class actions. Rick now spends a considerable portion of his time on managing his family office which he founded.


Rick also dedicates a substantial portion of time to philanthropy and is involved with n ... (view full description)





Brian Stutman
President Castle Hill Capital Partners


                                                    Brian Stutman graduated cum laude from the University of Massachusetts, Amherst with Bachelor of Arts in 1989. He joined Wall Street after a 10 year entrepreneurial career and selling his last company, Employee Information Services, to a private equity firm.
Brian has 15+ years’ experience in trading, electronic trading and prime brokerage. Having started his career at Carlin Equities, Brian opened the West Palm Beach branch and was promoted to supervise all of Florida. Brian was the lead salesperson during his tenure at Carlin, staying with the firm for over 7 years until it was purchased by Royal Bank of Canada in 2006. At Royal Bank of Canada Brian held a key role in newly for ... (view full description)





Patrick Stutz
Chief Investment Officer Bayshore


                                                    As Chief Investment Officer for Bayshore, Patrick leads the firm’s investment process, including asset allocation, investment analysis and manager selection. He heads the firm’s investment committee and is responsible for portfolio management. Patrick has 20+ years of investment experience, most recently as a New York-based portfolio manager for Ivory Capital, an alternative investment firm. Previously, he served as a manager of alternative strategies for RMF/Man Investments. Patrick started his career at Swiss-based Vontobel Group, where he served in several roles within the investment banking and asset management divisions. Patrick graduated magna cum laude from the University of Zurich, w ... (view full description)





Amanda Tepper
Chief Executive Officer Chestnut Advisory Group


                                                    Amanda Tepper is the Founder and CEO of Chestnut Advisory Group, a consulting firm working exclusively with asset managers, providing outsourced investor education services. Chestnut helps our clients tell their story to investors in a focused and impactful way that enables them to raise more assets more quickly, and retain them longer. All of Chestnut's Senior Advisors have deep investment backgrounds, so we can ask the right questions, understand the answers, and build what we call a 'High ROI Story 'for our clients.Before founding Chestnut Advisory Group, Amanda held several significant roles in her over 25-year career across the capital markets, most recently as Global Dir ... (view full description)





Charles Trafton
Portfolio Manager FlowPoint Capital Partners


                                                    Leveraging two decades of fundamental equity research and money management experience, Chuck is responsible for implementing the FlowPoint investment strategy. He has responsibility for fundamental and quantitative research, trading, and strategy simulations. From 2006-2013, Chuck was a PM and analyst at The Boston Company Asset Management, a $45 billion asset manager. As Portfolio Manager in the Portfolio Engineering Group 2012-2013, Chuck managed a U.S. equity fund and from 2006-2012 he was a member of the TBC Small Cap Growth team that managed $3 billion U.S. small and mid-cap equities. He’s authored dozens of studies, tools, screens and processes in use today e.g., stop-loss, trend, fact ... (view full description)





Steve Turi
Chief Investment Officer BPV Capital Management


                                                    Steve Turi, Chief Investment Officer: Steve brings over 25 years investment industry experience. Prior to BPV, he served as Managing Partner and CIO of both SkyView and Riverview Investments. Steve was a Director at Barclays. In1992, he began working with Harry Markowitz at Daiwa’s Global Portfolio Research Dept, and ultimately headed the Global Equity Derivatives and Portfolio Trading Dept. BSEE, New Jersey Institute of Technology; MBA, NYU Stern School of Business.
 
                                                
                                            




Frank Turner
Portfolio Manager MIG Capital, LLC


                                                    Frank joined MIG Absolute Return in 2008 and oversees all fund of hedge fund investments for the investment manager. Prior to joining MIG AR, Frank was a Senior Vice President in Bank of America’s Strategic Risk Group in charge of devising trading strategies to hedge the bank’s consumer debt portfolio and a Vice President at Goldman Sachs Hedge Funds Strategies Group in Princeton, New Jersey. Frank began his career as member of the Portfolio Credit Group at Goldman Sachs & Co. Frank is a graduate of Howard University, Cum Laude and a native of Mobile, Alabama.
                                                
                                            




Casey Wamsley
Director Collins Capital Investments


                                                    
Mr. Wamsley has over 20 years of experience spanning the full spectrum of financial markets. Prior to joining Collins Capital, Mr. Wamsley was the founder and President of Phoenician Capital, LLC, where he specialized in alternative investment consulting to registered investment advisory firms and institutional clients. He has held leading roles at prominent investment consulting and advisory firms including Schwab Institutional. He began his career at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and the Chicago Board of Trade trading interest rate futures and options and earned his floor membership while working for BNP Paribas. Mr. Wamsley received his BBA in Finance from the Cox School of ... (view full description)





James White
Senior Vice President, Convertible Securities Palisade Capital Management, LLC


                                                    
James White joined Palisade Capital in July 2015 as Senior Vice President, Convertible Securities. In this role, Mr. White has responsibility for researching and monitoring recommended positions within the convertible arbitrage strategy, recommending option strategies to enhance returns and reduce risk, developing new strategies, and assisting in marketing all convertible investment products. Prior to joining Palisade, Mr. White was a Portfolio Manager at Tugar Capital Management, L.P. For the fourteen years prior to joining Tugar, Mr. White was a Principal and co-manager of Excelsior Capital Management, LLC, a relative value/volatility and fixed income hedge fund. Prior to join ... (view full description)





Peter Willett
Principal, Investment Consulting Mercer


                                                    Peter is a principal in the Investment Consulting practice at Mercer where he specializes in researching Hedge Funds and Multi-asset strategies. He joined the firm in 2008 and is based in Boston.Peter previously built and ran a firm that designed and marketed multi-strategy currency programs for asset managers. Earlier, he spent sixteen years at State Street Global Advisors and PanAgora Asset Management in Boston, primarily as a currency portfolio manager. He has also held international equity research and sales positions in New York and Tokyo. Peter holds a BA from Vassar College, an MS in International Economics from Suffolk University, and an MBA from Columbia University.  ... (view full description)





Ash Williams
Executive Director & CIO The Florida State Board of Administration


                                                    Ash Williams, Executive Director & CIO of the Florida State Board of Administration, is responsible for managing approximately $180 billion in assets including those of the Florida Retirement System, the fifth largest public pension fund in the United States.
Prior to joining the SBA, Ash was a Managing Director at Fir Tree Partners and President and CEO of Schroder Capital Management, both headquartered in New York City.
He has extensive experience with both the SBA and Florida government, serving as Executive Director of the SBA from 1991 to 1996 and in senior management in Florida’s executive and legislative branches. 
He chairs the boards of the Economic Club of Flo ... (view full description)





 
 



        NETWORK OPEN
    
 




Sign In
Email
Password
Remember me


   








Contact Information
INFORMATION MANAGEMENT NETWORK
1120 Avenue of the Americas, 6th Floor
                New York, NY 10036 USA

            Phone: +1 (212) 901-0506
(8:30 AM - 5:30 PM Eastern Time / Monday-Friday)

            E-mail:	mail@imn.org


Event Specific Contacts for 22nd Annual Alpha Hedge East
                    



COOKIESThis page explains what cookies are, how we use them on the websites of the Euromoney Institutional Investor PLC group and your options for controlling them. Please note:Not all the cookies listed here will necessarily be used on each websiteWe will display our triangular red cookie prompt once when you visit each of our sites. If you send us a request as explained in the table below, this will apply to your use of all our sites so you only need to make one request.What are cookies?Cookies are pieces of information which include a unique reference code that a website transfers to your device to store and sometimes track information about you.  A number of cookies we use last only for the duration of your web session (“session cookies”) and expire when you close your browser. Other cookies are used, for example, to remember you when you return to the site and will last for longer (“persistent cookies”).  Cookies cannot be used to run programs or deliver viruses to your computer. They are uniquely assigned to your device and are sent back to the originating website on each subsequent visit (if they last longer than a web session) or to another website that recognises that cookie.Some of the cookies used by our sites are set by us, and some are set by third parties who are delivering services (such as interest based advertising and web analytics) on our behalf.What do we use cookies for?Some cookies are essential to enable you to move around the website and use its features, such as accessing secure areas of the website or areas with paid-for content. Without these cookies, services you have asked for, like shopping baskets, cannot be provided. Because such cookies are essential for using a site, these cookies cannot be turned off without severely affecting your use of the website.Other cookies perform various functions, as the table below explains, together with your options for controlling them.  Some cookies may also be controlled by using your web browser settings. Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set.You can also learn more about cookies in general by visiting www.allaboutcookies.org which includes additional useful information on cookies and how to block cookies using different types of browser.For more general information about online behavioural (interest based) advertising and how it uses cookies, you may wish to visit www.youronlinechoices.euOur cookies and your options:Type of cookieExampleWhat it doesYour optionsPerformanceBIGipServereuromoneyfxnews-poolThese cookies allow us to manage the technical performance of the website such as load balancing to ensure that the site is available to all users You may set your browser to reject these cookies but this is likely to affect your use of the siteFunctionalityISDefaultCurrencyThese cookies remember choices you make to improve your experience.  For example, they allow the website to remember selections such as language, currency, region or changes to text size and to remember you on return visits.  They may also be used, for example, to remember the point you have reached in a survey so that you can return to it later.  By choosing an option such as remember me, text size or participating in a survey or similar services that necessitate the use of a cookie, you will be indicating your consent to that cookie.   You may set your browser to reject these cookies but this is likely to affect your use of the siteActivity logging - websitesASP.NET_sessionIdThis cookie is essential to authorise your access to content and services that are not publicly available including paid-for content.  If you are a registered user, trialist or subscriber, when you log on, this places a cookie on your machine. Once you are logged on, we monitor your activity on our websites, for example, which articles you read.  This is for the following purposes: We need to ensure compliance with your user license and adherence to our terms and conditions as part of your trial or subscription.  (Our terms and conditions are published on our websites and can be accessed by a link in the footer of each page)For customer service purposes to provide users with a tailored service and to develop products and services reflecting our users’ needsIf you would prefer us not to use your activity log for customer service purposes, you can request that we anonymise it for these uses. This will affect our ability to understand your requirements and personalise your browsing experience in the future.Please note: If you are just browsing our sites without going through a log-in procedure, you will remain anonymous and we will not log your activity. To request anonymisation please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.comPlease include the following details:Your user name  that you use to access our website(s) – this will be an email addressYour nameYour company nameThe Euromoney website(s)  you use  Third party cookies:Third partyWhat it doesWhere to go for further information on these cookies including turning them offDoubleClickDoubleClick is a service provided by Google.  Its cookies are used to serve advertising relevant to users’ interests and measure the effectiveness of online marketing campaigns for our sites.    http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/ads/Google AnalyticsGoogle Analytics is a web analytics tool that helps us to understand how our users engage with our websites and so allows us to better tailor our websites to our users’ needs.The tool uses a cookie in order to evaluate use of content and compile reports for us on activity on our websites and Apps. https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptoutWebtrendsWebtrends is a web analytics tool that performs similar functions to Google Analytics in helping us to understand how our users engage with our websiteshttp://kb.webtrends.com/support/solutiondetail.aspx?Id=50140000000a79PAAQIf you would like further information or guidance on cookies, please contact us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com




TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF USE

            Below are the terms and conditions governing your use of EIMN, LLC ("IMN") this website and any products or services connected therewith. By using the website or services connected with the website, you acknowledge and agree to the following:

*Your Obligations. You represent and warrant that you have the capacity to agree to these Terms and you are at least eighteen (18) years of age. To the extent any individual accesses a Site or uses a Service as an employee, partner, director, agent or representative ("Agent") of any legal entity which is a Subscriber, the Agent warrants that he or she has authority to agree to these Terms on behalf of the relevant legal entity.

            You will procure that you and any licensed user under your subscription will: (a) comply with all applicable laws in relation to the site and services, including without limitation, laws relating to the use of Intellectual Property; (b) not use the site or the content outside the scope of permitted use and will not infringe any Intellectual Property or other rights in or relating to the site or the services or of any third party; (c) not copy, reproduce, recompile, decompile, disassemble, reverse engineer, upload, download, transmit, create derivative works from or otherwise exploit or tamper with the site or any software embodied in any site or service; (d) not prevent or restrict the use of any site or service by other authorized users nor hack into or cause damage to any server or other equipment operated by us; and (e) comply fully with these Terms.

*No IMN Warranties or Representations. IMN makes no warranty, express or implied, concerning any use of this website or any service or product provided in connection with this website. The services and products provided by IMN are provided on an "AS IS" basis. IMN disclaims any implied warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose, including any warranty for the use or the results of the use of the products or services. IMN is not responsible for correcting, maintaining or updating the data and services made available on this website.

            Any material and analysis provided by or through IMN or this website is not a recommendation that must be followed or an offer, or solicitation of an offer to buy or sell any financial product; IMN does not recommend that you enter into a particular transaction or represent that any product or service described on this website is suitable for you or your company. Nor is any information displayed here promoting any particular financial product, service or trading strategy in any jurisdiction where such an offer or solicitation, or trading strategy may be prohibited. As all prudent investors know, some transactions, including but without limitation, those involving high-yield securities, give rise to substantial risk and any investment decision you may make is your own. You should not enter into any transactions unless you have fully understood all such risks and have independently determined that such transactions are appropriate for you. Any discussion of the risks contained herein with respect to any product should not be considered to be a disclosure of all risks or complete discussion of the risks mentioned.

*Restricted Use. As a user of this website, you are not permitted to display, modify, copy, print or otherwise use the information made available to you here only for your own use. You are not permitted to publish, transmit, or otherwise make this information available in any format to any third party without the prior express written consent of IMN. You also are not permitted to change or remove any copyright (©), trademark (®, SM, TM) any other notices displayed with the information. IMN can modify the information at any time and for any reason at its sole discretion. Unless expressly stated otherwise herein, no rights are granted to you regarding the information on this website from IMN or any other source, including third party providers of information for this website, which shall under no circumstances be liable to you in any way.
            

*IMN Monitoring. Your use of the products and services on this Web site may be monitored by IMN in any lawful manner, and that the resulting information may be used by IMN for its internal business purposes or in accordance with the rules of any applicable regulatory or self-regulatory organization.
            

*Website or Internet failure. IMN shall have no liability, contingent or otherwise, to you or to third parties, or any responsibility whatsoever, for the failure of any connection or communication service to provide or maintain your access to this service, or for any interruption or disruption of such access or any erroneous communication between IMN and you. IMN also does not warrant or represent that the website shall be completely secure, specifically including without limitation, that no unauthorized person shall intercept or access information transmitted by you.
            

*Website Access. Access to this website is restricted by password and only authorized IMN registrants may use the website. Any unauthorized access shall be the responsibility of the Registrant and his or her company and IMN shall not be liable for any damages arising out of such unauthorized access. You agree to: (1) Keep your password confidential; (2) prohibit others from using your account; (3) refrain from using other Users’ accounts; (4) refrain from selling, trading, or otherwise transferring your account to another party; and (5) refrain from charging anyone for access to any portion of DirectConnect, or any information arising therefrom. You are also responsible for anything that happens through your account unless you can demonstrate that your account was accessed without your knowledge or fault.
            

*User Communication. To the extent permitted while using DirectConnect, you can use and participate in groups, free to post and delete comment on the website. You are solely responsible for your interactions with other users. IMN may limit the number of connections you may have to other users and may at its sole discretion prohibit you from contacting other users through use of the Services or otherwise limit your use of the Services.
            

            If you violate this Agreement while posting, that content may be removed without further notice or the rights of others posting here. Nothing you post here is confidential or proprietary and you are cautioned that other posters or viewers may use any information posted here. By posting here you agree that IMN is not responsible for the misappropriation or misuse of any information posted on this website.
            

*Privacy. Any submissions, including private personal information, like names, addresses and so on, are voluntary and you waive any and all rights you have to the protection of that information. By submitting ideas, suggestions, documents or other matter ("Submissions"), you agree that: (a) the Submissions are not confidential or proprietary information; (b) IMN has no obligation to keep the submissions confidential; (c) IMN can use or disclose the Submissions for any purpose, in any way, in any media worldwide; (d) if asked, you will irrevocably assign to IMN all rights to your Submissions; and (f) you are not entitled to any compensation of any kind from IMN under any circumstances.
            

*Content by Becoming a User of DirectConnect: As part of obtaining registration access to DirectConnect, unless you opt out, you may receive invitations to network from other conference attendees. We may also send you emails to keep you updated on developments in the site and services. Your registration for and/or subscription to such an email service and your use of the content received through these email services will be subject to these terms. You can unsubscribe to our email service by changing your email preferences on the website.
            

*License. If you comply with all your obligations under this Agreement, IMN grants you a limited, revocable, nonexclusive license and right to access the Services, through a generally available web browser, mobile device or application view information and use the web pages and in accordance with this Agreement for your use only. Any other use of DirectConnect is strictly prohibited. All rights not expressly granted in this Agreement, including, without limitation, title, ownership, intellectual property rights, and all other rights are retained by IMN.
            

*Anti-Hacking. You expressly agree not to use or attempt to use any "virus," "spyware," "malware," "adware," "Trojan horse" "deep-link," "scraper," "bot," "spider," "data-mining," "computer code" or any other automated device, program, tool, algorithm, process, or methodology or manual process having similar processes or functionality, to access, acquire, copy, or monitor any portion of this website or content. You also agree not to obtain or attempt to obtain through any means any materials or information on the website that have not been intentionally made available either by their public display on the Web Site or through their accessibility by a visible link or portal. You further agree not to violate the security of the website or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the website, data, materials, information, computer systems or networks connected to any server, through hacking, password mining or any other method.
            

*No Linkage. You expressly agree not to link or attempt to link to this website or the web pages contained herein.
            

*Third Party Information. Some of the information you access here is the property of third parties, made available here with the express permission of those third parties. IMN is not responsible for the content of any third party information provided on this website. You are cautioned that any further use of that information by you may be subject to the rights of those third parties and you may be required to obtain a license to use any such information. Failure to obtain third party permission may be a violation of federal law. You should contact the third party provider of the information to ascertain the requirements for using the information.
            

*Copyright and Trademarks. The layout of the website pages, graphics and pictures used and the collection of individual contributions are protected by copyright. All copyrights belong either to IMN, the third-party content providers or both. Either IMN or the third-party content providers own all trademarks and service marks depicted here.
            

*Indemnification. You agree to indemnify hold harmless and defend IMN, including our employees, officers, agents and contractors and our related entities and their employees, officers, partners, agents and contractors ("Indemnified") and continue to keep the Indemnified indemnified from and against any actions, proceedings, claims, demands, costs (on a full indemnity basis including, without limitation, reasonable legal and accounting fees) brought or made against the Indemnified by any person arising in connection with your use of the Website or content, or a breach of your representations and warranties in the Terms and Conditions of Use or this Agreement, or your violation of any of the Terms and Conditions of Use or this Agreement or any other activity in which you engage on or through, and from and against any damage, loss(whether personal or property, and whether direct or consequential, including without limitation consequential financial loss), cost or expense suffered or incurred by any Indemnified as a direct or indirect consequence thereof.
            

*Changes in Terms and Conditions. IMN may at any time revise the terms and conditions by which you may access the website or use IMN products or services. By using this website and IMN products and services, you agree to be bound by any such revisions and should therefore periodically visit this page to determine the then current version of this document.
            

*Limitation of Liability. Neither we, nor any of our suppliers, officers, employees, partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, successors and assigns, agents or representatives (our "Representatives") will be liable to you for:
            

            (a) any incidental, punitive, indirect, special or consequential damage, loss or expenses, including but not limited to any loss of business, contracts, revenue, or profits, any business interruption, security breach, loss of data, loss of goodwill or reputation or other pecuniary loss suffered by you, even if we or any of our Representatives have been advised of their possible existence; nor? (b) any direct damage loss or expenses arising from loss of customers, loss of profits, loss of anticipated profits or loss of savings.
            

*Termination. You may terminate this Agreement, for any or no reason, at any time, when IMN receives notice from you. IMN may terminate the Agreement and your account for any reason or no reason, at any time, with or without notice. This cancellation shall be effective immediately or as may be specified in the notice and may include disabling your current and future access to DirectConnect. IMN may also suspend or terminate this Agreement if you invite other users with whom you do not know to connect; abuse the any DirectConnect messaging services; creating multiple or false profiles; infringe on any intellectual property rights, violating any provisions in this Agreement, disparage IMN or its executives, Board members, affiliates, staff or other related entities or persons, or exhibit any other behavior that IMN, in its sole discretion, deems contrary to the purpose of the website.
            

*No Waiver. Failure by either party to exercise any right or remedy under these Terms does not constitute a waiver of that right or remedy.
            

*Entire Agreement. These terms (including any terms incorporated by reference in these terms), constitute the entire agreement between you and us with respect to your access to and use of the website or receipt of any service and supersede all prior agreements, negotiations and discussions between you and us relating to the same.
            

*Law and Jurisdiction. Where you visit, register and/or subscribe to a this site or related service (as indicated on this website or otherwise notified to you), these terms (and any dispute or claim arising out of or in connection with these terms, including non-contractual disputes or claims), to the maximum extent permissible under the law of the territory that you are located in, will be governed by the laws of the State of New York. Any action to enforce these terms shall be brought in a federal court or a state court located in the state of New York, county of New York, and you agree to submit yourself to the personal jurisdiction of those courts in any such action.
            

*Force Majeure. We shall not be deemed to be in breach of these Terms by reason of any delay in performing, or any failure to perform any service or our obligations in relation to these Terms, if the delay or failure was due to any cause beyond our reasonable control, including but not limited to acts of God, explosions, floods, fire or accident, war or threat of war, terrorism or threat of terrorism, sabotage, civil disturbance, epidemics, prohibitions or measures of any kind on the part of any governmental, parliamentary or local authority, import or export regulations or embargoes, or industrial actions or trade disputes (whether involving our employees or of third parties).
            

*Severability. If any provision of these Terms is found to be wholly or partially invalid, void or unenforceable by any court having competent jurisdiction or by virtue of any legislation or any other reason, that provision shall be invalid, void or unenforceable to that extent only and no further and the validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions of these Terms shall not be affected.
            

*Notices. Any notice given pursuant to these Terms shall be made by email or first class post, in the case of you, to the address provided on your registration form and, in the case of us, to the address posted on the website or otherwise notified to you in relation to any relevant service. Any such notice shall be deemed to have arrived if sent by post within three (3) days of posting and if sent by email at the time of transmission.
        



PRIVACY STATEMENT
Our Privacy Commitments

                Euromoney Institutional Investor PLC and Institutional Investor Inc. (together "we") respect the privacy of every person who visits, registers with or subscribes to our 
                websites and online publications ("you"), and are committed to ensuring a safe online experience.
                This Privacy Statement outlines the information we may collect about you in relation to your use of our websites and related publications and services ("personal data") and 
                how we may use that personal data. It also outlines the methods by which we and our service providers may (subject to necessary consents) monitor your online behaviour 
                in order to deliver customised advertisements and marketing materials and other tailored services. This Privacy Statement also tells you how you can verify the 
                accuracy of your personal data and how you can request that we delete or update it.
            
This Privacy Statement applies to all websites operated by us (as indicated on the relevant website) ("Sites"). For the purpose of this Privacy Statement 
                "group company" shall mean Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and any of its subsidiary companies, including, without limitation, Institutional Investor Inc. 
                Please note that the Sites may contain links to external sites and may contain advertisements for, and/or the opportunity for you to purchase products or services 
                from third parties. This privacy statement does not cover the activities of such third parties, and you should consult those third party sites' privacy policies for 
                information on how your data is used by them.By accessing and using the Sites you are agreeing to the terms of this Privacy Statement.
            

Information about us


                Our principal business activities are:
            

Business-to-Business Financial Publishing. We provide a range of products and services focused on international finance, metals, commodities, 
                    telecoms and emerging markets including magazines, newsletters, electronic information and data
Organisers of Seminars, Conferences, Training Courses and Exhibitions for the financial markets industry


                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc Company Address:
            

                Nestor House,
                Playhouse Yard,
                London EC4V 5EXUnited Kingdom
            

                Institutional Investor, Inc. Company Address:
            

                1120 Ave of the Americas, 6th floor
                New York, NY 10036
                USA
            

Name of the Data Controller


                The Data Controllers are Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and Institutional Investor Inc.
                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc is subject to the UK Data Protection Act 1998 and is registered in the UK with the Information Commissioner's Office.
            

Collection of Personal Data


                Our primary goal in collecting personal data from you is to give you an enjoyable customised experience whilst allowing us to provide services and 
                features that most likely meet your needs. We collect certain personal data from you, which you give to us when using our Sites and/or registering 
                or subscribing for our products and services. However, we also give you the option to access our Sites' home pages without subscribing or registering or 
                disclosing your personal data. We also collect certain personal data from other group companies to whom you have given information through their 
                websites (including, by way of example, Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and Institutional Investor Inc, in accordance with the purposes listed below).
                Please note that we do not intend to collect any personal data from children under thirteen years of age and no child under thirteen should submit any 
                personal data to any of the Sites. Should we discover that any such personal data has been delivered to any of the Sites, we will remove that information 
                as soon as possible.
            

Types of Personal Data Held and its Use

Customer Services and Administration

                At some Sites, Euromoney collects personal data such as your name, job title, work and/or home address, and telephone number and email address in order to 
                register you for access to certain content and subscriptions. This information may be supplemented with demographic information from your use of our Sites 
                such as your postal area, age, gender, purchasing preferences and interests. At other Sites, Euromoney may only collect broad demographic information 
                for aggregate use. This information is used to administer and deliver to you the products and/or services you have requested, to operate our Sites 
                efficiently and improve our service to you, and to retain records of our business transactions and communications. By using the Sites and submitting personal 
                information through the registration process you are agreeing that we may collect, hold, process and use your information (including personal information) for 
                the purpose of providing you with the Site services and developing our business, which shall include (without limitation) the purposes described 
                below in paragraphs 2 and 3.
            
 Monitoring use of our Sites

                Where, as part of our Site services, we enable you to post information or materials on our Site, we may access and monitor any information which you 
                upload or input, including in any password-protected sections. Subject to any necessary consents, we also monitor and/or record the different Sites you 
                visit and actions taken on those Sites, e.g. content viewed or searched for. If you are a registered user (e.g. a subscriber or taking a trial), when you 
                log on, this places a cookie on your machine. This enables your access to content and services that are not publicly available. Once you are logged on, 
                the actions you take - for example, viewing an article - will be recorded (subject to any necessary consents). We may use technology or a service provider 
                to do this for us. This information may be used for one or more of the following purposes:
            


to fulfil our obligations to you;
to improve the efficiency, quality and design of our Sites and services;
to see which articles, features and services are most read and used
to track compliance with our terms and conditions of use, e.g. to ensure that you are acting within the scope of your user licence;
for marketing purposes (subject to your rights to opt-in and opt-out of receiving certain marketing communications) - see paragraph 3 below;
for advertising purposes, although the information used for these purposes does not identify you personally. Please see paragraph 5 below for more details;
to protect or comply with our legal rights and obligations; and
to enable our journalists to contact and interact with you online in connection with any content you may post to our Sites.



                Please see paragraph 5 below for more information on cookies and similar technologies and a link to a page where you can turn them on or off.
            
 Marketing:

                Some of your personal data collected under paragraphs 1 and 2 above may be used by us and/or our other group companies and third party service 
                providers to contact you by email, fax, telephone and/or post for sending information or promotional material on our products and/or services and/or 
                those of our other group companies. We give you the opportunity to opt-out of receiving marketing communications and will in certain circumstances 
                need to obtain your consent before sending such communications to you. Further detail can be found on the applicable Site and in each marketing communication 
                sent by us, our group companies or service providers. See also "Consents and opt-outs" section below.
            
Trading in Personal Data:

                Some of your personal data may be collected and processed with the intention of selling it to other organisations, but this will not be 
                done unless you have given your consent (separately to this privacy statement).
            
Cookies and similar technologies

                All our Sites use cookies and similar technical tools to collect information about your access to the Site and the services we provide.
            

                Cookies are pieces of information which include a unique reference code that a website transfers to your device to store and 
                sometimes track information about you. A number of cookies we use last only for the duration of your web session and expire when 
                you close your browser. Other cookies are used to remember you when you return to the Site and will last for longer. Cookies cannot 
                be used to run programs or deliver viruses to your computer. They are uniquely assigned to you and can only be read by a Web server in 
                the domain that issued the cookie.
            

                We may use cookies to:
            

remember that you have used the Site before; this means we can identify the number of unique visitors we receive to different parts of the Site. 
                    This allows us to make sure we have enough capacity for the number of users that we get and make sure that the Site runs fast enough;
                
remember your login session so you can move from one page to another within the Site;
store your preferences or your user name and password so that you do not need to input these every time you visit the Site;
customise elements of the layout and/or content of the pages of Site for you;
record activity on our Sites so that we understand how you use our Sites enabling us to better tailor our content, services and marketing to your needs;
collect statistical information about how you use the Site so that we can improve the Site; and
gather information about the pages on the Site that you visit, and also other information about other websites that you visit, so as to place you in a 
                    “market segment”. This information is only collected by reference to the IP address that you are using, but does include information about the county 
                    and city you are in, together with the name of your internet service provider. This information is then used to place interest-based advertisements 
                    on the Site which it is believed will be relevant to your market segment. For more information about this type of interest based advertising, and 
                    about how to turn this feature off please visit www.youronlinechoices.co.uk. 
                    (Please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com if you have any queries about cookies)


                Some of the cookies used by our Sites are set by us, and some are set by third parties who are delivering services (such as interest based advertising 
                directed at your market segment) on our behalf. To see a list of the cookies and similar technologies used on this Site and instructions on how to 
                turn them on and off click here. 
                (Please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com if you have any queries about cookies) 
            

                Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set. 
                You can also learn more about cookies in general by visiting www.allaboutcookies.org 
                which includes additional useful information on cookies and how to block cookies using different types of browser. Please note however, that by blocking, deleting or 
                turning off cookies used on the Site you may not be able to take full advantage of the Site.
            

Email tracking: So that we can better understand our users' needs, we track responses to our emails - for example, to see which links are the 
                most popular in newsletters, and to log and follow up responses to our marketing messages. To do this, we use pixel GIFs, also known as "pixel tags" - these are 
                small image files that are placed within the body of our email messages. They enable us to tell if a message has been opened and to track click-throughs on links 
                within the message. Any other purposes for which Euromoney wishes to use your personal data will be notified to you and your personal data will not be used 
                for any such purpose without obtaining your prior consent.
            

Consents and opt-outs


                You can give your consent to or opt out of particular uses of your data as indicated above by:
            

Indicating at the point on the relevant Site where personal data is collected;
Informing us by email, post or phone; or
Updating your preferences on the applicable Site;


                For turning cookies and similar technologies on and off, see the information in paragraph 5 above.
            

Disclosures


                Information collected at one Site may be shared between Euromoney Institutional Investor plc, Institutional Investor Inc. and other group companies for the 
                purposes listed above. Your personal data may also be sold to other companies in the form of lists and directories, but only after permission from 
                you in accordance with the provisions above. We may also disclose your personal data to other third parties, including, without limitation, professional 
                advisers, or governmental or State institutions or regulatory authorities, where necessary in order to exercise or defend legal rights or where required by law.
            

                We may transfer, sell or assign any of the information described in this policy to third parties as a result of a sale, merger, consolidation, change of control, 
                transfer of assets or reorganisation of our business.
            

Public forums, message boards and blogs


                Some of our Sites make message boards, blogs or other facilities for user generated content available and users can participate in these facilities. 
                Any information that is disclosed in these areas becomes public information and you should always be careful when deciding to disclose your personal information.
            

Transfers outside the EEA


                Services on the Internet are accessible globally so collection and transmission of personal data is not always limited to one country. 
                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc may transfer your personal data, for the purposes listed above, to other group companies, service providers or other 
                third parties which may be located in countries outside the European Economic Area, whose laws may not give the level of protection to personal data as within the UK. 
                This will include transfers to Institutional Investor Inc. in the US (and Institutional Investor Inc. will collect some data directly from you, in relation to the 
                Sites which it operates) and to third parties who provide us with email and marketing services. Where we conduct any transfers we will take all steps reasonably 
                necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
            
Confidentiality and Security of Your Personal Data
We are committed to keeping the data you provide us secure and will take reasonable precautions to protect your personal data from loss, misuse or alteration.
The transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the 
                security of your data transmitted to our Site; any transmission is at your own risk. Once we have received your information, we will use strict procedures and 
                security features described above to try to prevent unauthorised access. We have implemented information security policies, rules and technical measures to 
                protect the personal data that we have under our control from:

unauthorised access
improper use or disclosure
unauthorised modification
unlawful destruction or accidental loss

All our employees, contractors and data processors (i.e. those who process your personal data on our behalf, for the purposes listed above), who have access to, and 
                are associated with the processing of your personal data, are obliged to keep the information confidential and not use it for any other purpose than to carry out 
                the services they are performing for us. We also give you the option of using a secure transmission method to send us personal data identifiers, such as 
                credit card details and bank account number. How to Access, Update and Erase your Personal Information


                If you wish to know whether we are keeping personal data about you, or if you have an enquiry about our privacy policy or your personal data held by us, in 
                relation to any of the Sites, you can contact the Data Protection Officer via:
            

Postal mail to this address: Data Protection Officer, Euromoney Institutional Investor plc, Nestor House, Playhouse Yard, London EC4V 5EX, UK
Telephone: +44 (0)20 7779 8600
Email: 
dataprotectionofficer@euromoneyplc.com


Upon request, we will provide you with a readable copy of the personal data which we keep about you. We may require proof of your identity and may charge a 
                small fee (not exceeding the statutory maximum fee that can be charged) to cover administration and postage.
Euromoney allows you to challenge the data that we hold about you and, where appropriate in accordance with applicable laws, you may have your personal information:

erased
rectified or amended
completed

Changes to this Privacy Statement
We will occasionally update this Privacy Statement to reflect new legislation or industry practice, group company changes and customer feedback. 
                We encourage you to review this Privacy Statement periodically to be informed of how we are protecting your personal data.
This Privacy Statement was last updated in April 2012.






                This  email already exists, please use "Forgot Password" page to reset a password for an existing account.
                

(Click "Reset Password" button below and email with password reset instruction will be emailed to you.)







                This  email you entered is not in valid format.
                






Reset Password
Email






 

Strategic Capital Management, LLC by Vaia Promogianni on PreziCreateExploreLearn & supportGet startedLog inPricingGet startedLog inMy PrezisExploreLearn & supportProductCompanyCareersSupportCommunityContactAppsEnglishEspañol한국어日本語DeutschPortuguêsFrançaisMagyarItaliano×Houston, we have a problem!Oops. A firewall is blocking access to Prezi content. Check out this article to learn more or contact your system administrator.
                Loading presentation...
            
        You’re using the new, improved player. You can always go back to the old viewer.
    Switch back
            
                
                    Public
                
            
            
                & reusable
            
        
            Create your own
        
                    Make a copy
                
    Share

        Embed
    
                Liked
            
                Like
            Present Remotely Send the link below via email or IMCopy Present to your audienceStart remote presentationInvited audience members will follow you as you navigate and presentPeople invited to a presentation do not need a Prezi accountThis link expires 10 minutes after you close the presentationA maximum of 30 users can follow your presentationLearn more about this feature in our knowledge base article
    Do you really want to delete this prezi?

    Neither you, nor the coeditors you shared it with will be able to recover it again.
DeleteCancelMake your likes visible on Facebook?
        Connect your Facebook account to Prezi and let your likes appear on your timeline.
        You can change this under Settings & Account at any time.
    No, thanksConnect with FacebookStrategic Capital Management, LLC
                            
                                No description
                            
                        
        
            by Vaia Promogianni
        
        on 9 February 2016
    TweetComments (0)
                                    Please log in to add your comment.
                                Report abuseTranscript of Strategic Capital Management, LLCFM409: RISK MANAGEMENT IN FINANCIAL MARKETSCharacteristicsNot registered with the SECActive management; managers compensated on performanceLimit on investor and investments type Lock-ups, no daily liquidity2 & 20 on feesNot heavily regulated- only disclosureFairness in pricing of fund sharesLimited use of leverageA Brief HistoryLong & short equity positions to “hedge” portfolioLeverage & arbitrage techniques Hedge Fund FeesWhy invest in Hedge Funds?Reduce risk by adding diversification : Minimize the correlation with equity and bond marketsBoost Returns : Hedge fund managers  highly specialized, trading only within their area of expertise Strategic Capital Management, LLCWhat is a hedge fund?offshore investment fund -private limited partnershipinvestments using pooled funds to earn active return, alphaaggressively managed using derivatives and leverage in domestic and international markets “Phoenician merchants kept a fifth (20%) of the profits generated from their seafaring adventures and paid out the rest to their financiers”, so claimed Alfred Winslow Jones.AND2% Management Fee20% Performance FeePerformance FeesFees can be-higher-lower-levied after a target is metdepending on negotiationsHurdle Rate can be:-fixed-varyingOr High WatermarkLock- up & RedemptionStrategiesClientsLimited client capacity (<99 to to be excluded from SEC)Wealthy individuals and institutions Relatively high minimum investment limitOther Reasons Hedge Funds are  attractive1. Lack of Regulation 2. Lack of Transparency3. Lack of Investment Constraints 4.Complex Incentive StructuresRisk related costsDownside captureMaximum drawdownLeverageOther factorsFull transcriptMore presentations by
    
        
            Vaia Promogianni
        Eurosimulation Athens 2015Untitled PreziPopular presentationsSee more popular or the latest prezisPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsLanguages
                    English
                
                    Español
                
                    한국어
                
                    日本語
                
                    Deutsch
                
                    Português
                
                    Français
                
                    Magyar
                
                    Italiano
                InfogramChartsInfographicsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportBlogSee all© 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsInfogramInfogramChartsInfographicsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportLanguages
                                English
                            
                                Español
                            
                                한국어
                            
                                日本語
                            
                                Deutsch
                            
                                Português
                            
                                Français
                            
                                Magyar
                            
                                Italiano
                            © 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsConnect your Facebook account to Prezi and publish your likes in the future. OkNo, thanks



Company Profile | Phoenicia Ltd.


















Clearly Commited to you



Architecture & Design


Float Glass




True Color™ - Low Iron Glass


True Color™ 100- Low Iron Glass




True Color™ 100S- Low Iron Glass




True Color™ 200 - Low Iron Glass




True Color™ 300 - Low Iron Glass






Laminated Glass - Lami-P™


Sound Control Glass - Lami-P™-SC






Digital Printing on Glass - DigiP™







Defense Solutions


Secured Transparent Solutions


Bullet Resistant Glass




Blast Resistant Glass




Forced Entry Resistant Glass






Transparent Armour




ArmourP







Glass Solutions


Architectural




Interior Design




Protection







Services


Specification




Application Consulting




Logistic Consulting




Sample Kits







Products


Float Glass




Lami-P




Sound Control




True Color™




Glass- lite




Digi-P




Automotive Glass







Contact Us




Home » Company Profile


Company Profile

Phoenicia has been producing, developing and supplying glass since the year 1934.
Based in the Lower Galilee, in the fast developing industrial area of Nazareth, our factory is best situated for easy and quick deliveries to our local customers and to Haifa Port. And with the majority of our production shipped to more than 36 different countries, globally, Phoenicia has developed the experience necessary for this type of logistics challenge.
Float lines run 24/7, 365 days a year,  Phoenicias' line was built for the production of only  the highest quality low iron float glass, and  specialty glass products.
Our own in house fabrication lines include specifically designed solar mirrors for CSP, grinding and drilling for the perfectly fitted and finished top glass in your Photovoltaic module, digital printing in addition to our laminating lines dedicated to the production of security glass in commercial buildings and in the home.
As the sole float glass manufacturer in Israel, a country enveloped by pioneering technology, Phoenicia offers its customers experience and knowhow for optimal solutions to any glass requirement.
Phoenicia has over 250 valued employees. Due to our specially designed management structure, and unique working environment, that flourishes and thrives on the initiative of its people, resulting in thousands of satisfied customers.



History
Quality policy


Latest Project


First International Bank Tower


Azrieli Center, Tel Aviv


IDT Global Israel


Amdocs


Police Headquarters, Haifa


Weizman Center and Tel Aviv Sourasky Medical Center


Concentrated Solar Power


ARMOUR-P™


Magistrate Court, Petach Tikva


Kodak Offices





Ask for more info



Message
Add me to News Letter


Your message was sent successfully


 


עברית
Company Profile
CE Marking
News
Site Map

























			    Copyright © 2013 Phoenicia Ltd. All Rights Reserved. Created by Catom web designContact us


Architectural & Design ProjectsJerusalem Chords BridgeMagistrate Court, Petach TikvaGivatayim MallRabin Museum, Tel AvivSolar Energy Glass ProjectsConcentrated Solar PowerPhotovoltaicSecurity Glass ProjectsARMOUR-P™




